Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 3

Landlord Obligations

66-28-301. Security deposits.

All landlords of residential property requiring security deposits prior to occupancy are required to deposit all tenants' security deposits in an account used only for that purpose, in any bank or other lending institution subject to regulation by the state or any agency of the United States government.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B), the tenant shall have the right to inspect the premises to determine the tenant's liability for physical damages that are the basis for any charge against the security deposit. An inspection of the premises to determine the tenant's liability for physical damages that are the basis for any charge against the security deposit and the landlord's estimated costs to repair such damage shall be conducted as follows:

Upon request by the landlord for a tenant to vacate or within five (5) days after receipt by the landlord of written notice of the tenant's intent to vacate, the landlord may provide notice to the tenant of the tenant's right to be present at the inspection of the premises. Such notice may advise the tenant that the tenant may request a time of inspection to be set by the landlord during normal working hours. The landlord may require the inspection to be after the tenant has completely vacated the premises and is ready to surrender possession and return all means of access to the entire premises; provided, that the inspection shall be either on the day the tenant completely vacates the premises or within four (4) calendar days of the tenant vacating the premises. If the landlord provides written notice of the tenant's right to be present at the landlord's inspection and the tenant schedules an inspection, but fails to attend such inspection, the tenant waives the right to contest any damages found by the landlord as a result of such inspection by the landlord; provided, that notice of the tenant's waiver upon such circumstances is set out in the rental agreement.

If a tenant requests a mutual inspection as provided in subdivision (b)(1)(A), the landlord and tenant shall then inspect the premises and compile a comprehensive listing of any presently ascertainable damage to the unit that is the basis for any charge against the security deposit and the estimated dollar cost of repairing the damage. The landlord and tenant shall sign the listing. Except as provided in subsection (g), the signatures of the landlord and the tenant on the listing shall be conclusive evidence of the accuracy of the listing. If the tenant refuses to sign the listing, the tenant shall state specifically in writing the items on the list to which the tenant dissents.

If the tenant has acted in any manner set out in subdivisions (b)(2)(B)(i)-(vi), the landlord may inspect the premises and compile a comprehensive listing of any presently ascertainable damage to the unit that is the basis for any charge against the security deposit and the estimated dollar cost of repairing the damage without providing the tenant an opportunity to inspect the premises; provided, that the landlord provides a written copy, sent by certificate of mailing to the tenant, of the listing of any damages and estimated cost of repairs to the tenant upon the tenant's written request.

The tenant shall not have a right to inspect the premises as provided in this section if the tenant has:

Vacated the rental premises without giving written notice;

Abandoned the premises;

Been judicially removed from the premises;

Not contacted the landlord after the landlord's notice of right to mutual inspection of the premises;

Failed to appear at the arranged time of inspection as provided in subdivision (b)(1); or

If the tenant has not requested a mutual inspection pursuant to subsection (b) or is otherwise inaccessible to the landlord.

No landlord shall be entitled to retain any portion of a security deposit if the security deposit was not deposited in an account as required by subsection (a) and a listing of damages is not provided as required by subsection (b).

A tenant who disputes the accuracy of the final damage listing given pursuant to subsection (b) may bring an action in a circuit or general sessions court of competent jurisdiction of this state. The tenant's claim shall be limited to those items from which the tenant specifically dissented in accordance with the listing or specifically dissented in accordance with subsection (b); otherwise the tenant shall not be entitled to recover any damages under this section.

Should a tenant vacate the premises with unpaid rent or other amounts due and owing, the landlord may remove the deposit from the account and apply the moneys to the unpaid debt.

In the event the tenant leaves not owing rent and having any refund due, the landlord shall send notification to the last known or reasonably determinable address, of the amount of any refund due the tenant. In the event the landlord shall not have received a response from the tenant within sixty (60) days from the sending of such notification, the landlord may remove the deposit from the account and retain it free from any claim of the tenant or any person claiming in the tenant's behalf.

Nothing in this section precludes the landlord from recovering the costs of any and all contractual damages to which the landlord may be entitled, plus the cost of any additional physical damages to the premises that are discovered after an inspection that has been completed pursuant to subsection (b); provided, however, that costs of any physical damage to the premises may only be recovered if the damage was discovered by the landlord prior to the earlier of:

Thirty (30) days after the tenant vacated or abandoned the premises; or

Seven (7) days after a new tenant takes possession of the premises.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), all landlords of residential property shall be required to notify their tenants at the time such persons sign the lease and submit the security deposit, of the location of the account required to be maintained pursuant to this section, but shall not be required to provide the account number to such persons.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 2.101; T.C.A., § 64-2821; Acts 1984, ch. 645, § 1; 1992, ch. 995, §§ 2, 4-6; 1997, ch. 397, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 153, § 4; 2004, ch. 683, § 1; 2005, ch. 156, § 2; 2008, ch. 1067, § 3; 2011, ch. 272, §§ 6-9; 2012, ch. 887, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1992, ch. 995, § 7 provided that all landlord obligations mentioned in subsection (a) relative to security deposits shall apply only to rental agreements signed after July 1, 1992.

Acts 2008, ch. 1067, § 4 provided that the act shall apply to rental agreements entered into, extended or renewed on or after October 1, 2008.

Acts 2011, ch. 272, § 16 provided that the act, which amended subsections (a), (b), (c) and (g), shall apply to rental agreements entered into on or after October 1, 2011.

Acts 2012, ch. 887, § 3 provided that the act, which amended subsection (h), shall apply to rental agreements entered into or renewed on or after May 9, 2012.

Law Reviews.

Avoiding Lease-Drafting Pitfalls (C. Dewees Berry IV), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 11 (1983).

66-28-302. Address of landlord or agent.

The landlord or any person authorized to enter into a rental agreement on the landlord's behalf shall disclose to the tenant in writing at or before the commencement of the tenancy the name and address of:

The agent authorized to manage the premises; and

An owner of the premises or a person or agent authorized to act for and on behalf of the owner for the acceptance of service of process and for receipt of notices and demands.

The information required to be furnished by this section shall be kept current and this section extends to and is enforceable against any successor landlord, owner or manager.

A person who fails to comply with subsection (a) becomes an agent of each person who is a landlord for the purpose of service of process and receiving and receipting for notices and demands.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 2.102; T.C.A., § 64-2822.

66-28-303. Possession of dwelling.

At the commencement of the terms, the landlord shall deliver possession of the premises to the tenant in compliance with the rental agreement and §66-28-304. The landlord may bring an action for possession against any person wrongfully in possession and may recover the damages provided in §66-28-512(c).

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 2.103; T.C.A., § 64-2823.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 16.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-304. Maintenance by landlord.

The landlord shall:

Comply with requirements of applicable building and housing codes materially affecting health and safety;

Make all repairs and do whatever is necessary to put and keep the premises in a fit and habitable condition;

Keep all common areas of the premises in a clean and safe condition; and

In multi-unit complexes of four (4) or more units, provide and maintain appropriate receptacles and conveniences for the removal of ashes, garbage, rubbish and other waste from common points of collection subject to § 66-28-401(3).

If the duty imposed by subdivision (a)(1) is greater than any duty imposed by any other paragraph of subsection (a), the landlord's duty shall be determined by reference to subdivision (a)(1).

The landlord and tenant may agree in writing that the tenant perform specified repairs, maintenance tasks, alterations, and remodeling, but only if the transaction is entered into in good faith and not for the purpose of evading the obligations of the landlord.

The landlord may not treat performance of the separate agreement described in subsection (c) as a condition to any obligation or performance of any rental agreement.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 2.104; T.C.A., § 64-2824.

Cross-References. Rented premises unfit for habitation, title 68, ch. 111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 22.

Law Reviews.

The Unwarranted Implication of a Warranty of Fitness in Commercial Leases — An Alternative Approach, 41 Vand. L. Rev. 1057 (1988).

Tort — Premises Liability — Worsham v. Pilot Oil Corp.: Imputing Constructive Notice to the Proprietor of a Self-Service Establishment in Tennessee, 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1989).

66-28-305. Limitation of landlord's liability.

Unless otherwise agreed, a landlord who conveys premises that include a dwelling unit subject to a rental agreement in a good faith sale to a bona fide purchaser, landlord or agent, or both, is relieved of liability under the rental agreement and this chapter as to events occurring subsequent to written notice to the tenant of the conveyance and transfer of the security deposit to the bona fide purchaser.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 2.105; T.C.A., § 64-2825; Acts 2005, ch. 156, § 3.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

Collateral References.

Landlord's liability for failure to protect tenant from criminal acts of third person. 43 A.L.R.5th 207.